Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Hub height” means the distance from the ground to the  middle of a wind-powered
turbine’s rotor.
(b) “Light-mitigating technology system” means a system approved by the  Federal Avi-
ation Administration  that is capable of reducing the impact of obstruction lighting while
maintaining conspicuity sufficient to assist aircraft in identifying and avoiding  collision with
a structure or facility.
(c) “Maintenance” means activities to keep a wind energy facility  in an efficient operat-
ing condition and that do not add to the value or extend the expected  economic life or in-
crease the nameplate capacity or energy output of the facility.
(d) “Person” means a developer, owner or operator.
(e) “Repower” means to replace all or substantially all  of a wind energy facility for the
purpose of  extending the life of the facility, and the replacement is not part of routine
maintenance.
(f) “Wind energy facility”  means an electric power generating facility that is made up
of five or more wind-powered turbines and one or more of the wind-powered turbines:
(A) Are required under Federal  Aviation Administration regulations to have obstruction
lights; or
(B) Have an obstruction light and a hub height that is 75 or more feet above the ground
level.
(2) A wind  energy facility may not commence operations or, following repowering, re-
commence operations unless the person developing  or repowering the wind energy facility
meets the requirements in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A person developing or repowering a wind energy facility who receives  from the
Federal Aviation Administration a determination of no hazard  to air navigation with regard
to the wind energy facility shall apply to the  administration and, if applicable, the Federal
Communications Commission, for approval for the installation  and use of light-mitigating
technology systems for the wind energy facility’s wind-powered turbines.
(b) If the administration issues a determination that the installation and use of a  light-
mitigation technology system is not a hazard  to air navigation and, as applicable, the com-
mission issues its approval, the  person shall install and use light-mitigating technology
Enrolled House Bill 2375 (HB 2375-A) Page 1
systems on approved wind-powered turbines.  The person shall install and begin using the
light-mitigating technology systems:
(A) Within 24 months from the date the administration issues its determination;
(B) If applicable, within 24 months from the later of:
(i) The date the administration issues its determination; or
(ii) The date the commission issues its approval; or
(C) As soon as reasonably practicable after the date specified in subparagraph  (A) or (B)
of this paragraph if installation is delayed due to reasons outside of the person’s control.
(c) A person is not required to install or use a  light-mitigating technology system on a
wind-powered turbine if:
(A) The administration issues a determination that the installation or use of  the light-
mitigation technology system is a hazard to air navigation;
(B) The administration  does not issue a determination within 12 months from the date
the person submits the application to the administration;
(C) If applicable, the commission does not issue  its approval for the installation and use
of the light-mitigating technology system; or
(D) If applicable, the commission does not issue its approval within 12 months  from the
date the person submits the application to the commission.
(4) Nothing in this section shall require a person to carry out light mitigation in  a man-
ner that conflicts with an applicable federal law or regulation.
SECTION 2.
The governing body of a county or city or its  designee may not allow or
permit a wind energy facility, as defined in section 1  of this 2025 Act, unless the person
seeking to develop or repower the wind energy facility provides proof that the  person is in
compliance with the requirements in section 1 (3)(a) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act apply  to any wind energy facility, as defined
in section 1 of  this 2025 Act, for which a person applies, on or after January 1, 2028, to the
Federal Aviation Administration for a determination of  hazard or no hazard to air navigation
with regard to the wind energy facility.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2375 (HB 2375-A) Page 2